Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3601
Behavioral Intervention Training and Teacher Support Act, how cited.

Sections 79-3601 to 79-3604 shall be known and may be cited as the Behavioral Intervention Training and Teacher Support Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 2.